District of Columbia statutes.
36-503

Licensing and taxation.

Except as provided by 19 U.S.C. §§ 81a-81u , or by other Federal or District law, all activities and entities operating within a foreign trade zone that is established within the District of Columbia shall be subject to all applicable District licenses, permits, and taxation.

July 14, 1995, D.C. Law 11-28, § 4, 42 DCR 2569
1981 Ed., § 29-723.
2001 Ed., § 29-503.